Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-368
Substantial functional impairment, defined.

Substantial functional impairment shall mean a substantial incapability, because of physical limitations, of living independently or providing self-care as determined through observation, diagnosis, investigation, or evaluation.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 21.